Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1437
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Prior Learning Act:

(1) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education;

(2) Cut score means the minimum score an individual is required to achieve on a prior learning examination to receive postsecondary credit from a Nebraska public postsecondary institution;

(3) Nebraska public postsecondary institution has the same meaning as in section 85-2403; and

(4) Prior learning examination means a postsecondary level examination approved by the commission pursuant to section 85-1438 to assess whether a student, prior to taking a postsecondary course, has already obtained knowledge and skills at a level substantially similar to what is expected from a student who has successfully completed a postsecondary course on the same subject.

Laws 2026, LB937, § 21.
July 18, 2026